Hawaii, session 2025, SB192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the people of the State deserve to live in peace and security, without the public safety risks, health hazards, and traumatic impacts of illegal gunfire and illegal fireworks use. The legislature also finds that new technologies allow law enforcement officers to instantly detect and locate the geographic origin of explosions caused by gunfire or illegal fireworks.  According to a police lieutenant in Denver, his department's use of this technology allows them to receive notification of gunshots within forty seconds and respond to within twenty-five feet of an actual crime scene. The legislature notes that ShotSpotter is one such product that is currently being used by more than ninety cities nationwide.  According to ShotSpotter, in Oakland, one hundred and one gunshot wound victims were found and aided by police, although none of the shootings was reported.  In Winston-Salem, twenty-seven gunshot wound victims were aided with the assistance of ShotSpotter.  ShotSpotter has been shown to increase reporting of gunshots, decrease the time from reporting to dispatch, improve victim transport time, and more accurately identify crime scene locations. The legislature further finds that these technologies were originally developed to assist law enforcement in detecting gunshots but may also equip police departments to enforce fireworks laws. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Require county police departments to purchase and deploy explosion detection technology for departmental use; and (2)  Appropriate moneys as a grant-in-aid to the counties for this purpose. SECTION 2. (a)  The respective police departments of each county shall purchase explosion detection technology equipment for the purpose of assisting those departments in locating and responding to explosions caused by the illegal use of firearms and fireworks. (b) The chiefs of the respective police departments shall ensure that appropriate training is provided to police officers in the use of the explosion detection technology equipment. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 as a grant-in-aid to the several counties for the purposes of purchasing explosion detection technology equipment pursuant to section 2 of this Act; provided that the moneys shall be allocated as follows: (1)  $          by the county of Hawaii; (2)  $          by the county of Maui; (3)  $          by the county of Kauai; and (4)  $          by the city and county of Honolulu. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the respective counties for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________